Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6183.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Executive Office of
Health and Human Services shall establish a sick leave bank for Rosemarie Derry an employee
of the department. Any employee of the department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick,
personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Rosemarie Derry. If Rosemarie Derry
terminates employment with the department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any
remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick
leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that
necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the department.
of 1